Utah statutes.
48-2c-1808 (Repealed 07/01/13).   Insurance.

A company may purchase and maintain liability insurance on behalf of a person who is or was a manager, member, employee, fiduciary, or agent of the company, or who, while serving as a manager, member, employee, fiduciary, or agent of the company, is or was serving at the request of the company as a manager, member, director, officer, partner, trustee, employee, fiduciary, or agent of another foreign or domestic limited liability company or other person, or of an employee benefit plan, against liability asserted against or incurred by him in that capacity or arising from his status as a manager, member, employee, fiduciary, or agent, whether or not the company would have power to indemnify him against the same liability under Sections 48-2c-1802, 48-2c-1803, and 48-2c-1807.  Insurance may be procured from any insurance company designated by the company, whether the insurance company is formed under the laws of this state or any other jurisdiction of the United States or elsewhere, including any insurance company in which the company has an equity or any other interest through stock ownership or otherwise.



Enacted by Chapter 260, 2001 General Session 

Repealed by Chapter 353, 2011 General Session

